Maryland, session 2025, HB0172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
6–1301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Eligible project” means:
(1) [a facility and community improvement project] A COMMUNITY OR
BUSINESS DISTRICT IMPROVEMENT PROJECT as defined in § 6–1304 of this subtitle;
(2) [a business district and neighborhood security project as defined in §
6–1305 of this subtitle; or
(3)] a community–centered crime and violence intervention and prevention
project as defined in [§ 6–1306] § 6–1304 of this subtitle; OR
(3) ANY OTHER CATEGORY OF PROJECT IDENTIFIED BY THE
SECRETARY AS A RECOGNIZED CRIME PREVENTION STRATEGY DESIGNED TO
ADDRESS ENVIRONMENTAL, HEALTH, OR SAFETY CONCERNS IN COMMERCIAL,
PUBLIC, OR RESIDENTIAL AREAS.
(c) “Program” means the Community Health and Safety Works Grant Program.
6–1304.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “COMMUNITY–CENTERED CRIME AND VIOLENCE INTERVENTION
AND PREVENTION PROJECT” MEANS A COMPREHENSIVE STRATEGY THAT
INTEGRATES PARTNERSHIPS AND COORDINATED ACTIVITIES THAT:
(I) DIRECTLY ENGAGE INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE AT RISK OF
BECOMING INVOLVED WITH OR AFFECTED BY VIOLENCE AND CRIME USING
EVIDENCE–BASED INTERVENTIONS; AND
(II) REDUCE CRIME AND DISORDER BY CAREFULLY EXAMINING
THE CHARACTERISTICS OF PROBLEMS IN NEIGHBORHOODS AND APPLYING
APPROPRIATE PROBLEM–SOLVING REMEDIES.

HOUSE BILL 172 3
(3) (I) “COMMUNITY OR BUSINESS DISTRICT IMPROVEMENT
PROJECT” MEANS A PHYSICAL PROJECT OR COMMUNITY SERVICE THAT:
1. MAKES A FACILITY, A COMMUNITY, A COMMUNITY
OPEN SPACE, A RESIDENTIAL STREET, OR A COMMERCIAL CORRIDOR SAFER FOR
COMMUNITY USE;
2. SUPPORTS COMMUNITY–LED EFFORTS TO IMPROVE
THE APPEARANCE OF A FACILITY, A COMMUNITY, A COMMUNITY OPEN SPACE, A
RESIDENTIAL STREET, OR A COMMERCIAL CORRIDOR;
3. ELIMINATES PREDATORY OR UNHEALTHY
PRACTICES, SUCH AS ILLEGAL DUMPING, LITTERING, OR ENVIRONMENTAL OR
TRAFFIC HAZARDS; OR
4. MITIGATES THE URBAN HEAT ISLAND EFFECT AND
OTHER CONDITIONS RELATED TO CLIMATE CHANGE.
(II) “COMMUNITY OR BUSINESS DISTRICT IMPROVEMENT
PROJECT” INCLUDES THE PURCHASE OR INSTALLATION OF:
1. SECURITY CAMERAS, LICENSE READERS, OR
ADEQUATE LIGHTING FOR OUTDOOR SPACES AND COMMON AREAS;
2. LANDSCAPE ARCHITECTURAL DESIGN FEATURES,
INCLUDING SIGNS, GARDENS, PAVING TREATMENTS, PLANTINGS, OR OTHER
UPGRADES TO PUBLIC SPACES;
3. CONTRACTED LAND ENHANCEMENT OR
GROUNDSKEEPING SERVICES TO MAINTAIN OR CLEAN OPEN SPACES;
4. CONTRACTED CLEANING OR LANDSCAPING SERVICES
OR EQUIPMENT TO MAINTAIN OR CLEAN OPEN SPACES;
5. CONTRACTED LOCAL PRIVATE SECURITY SERVICES
OR SIMILAR COMMUNITY–BASED PROGRAMS WITH A SPECIFIC EMPHASIS ON
DE–ESCALATION AND RELATIONSHIP BUILDING; AND
6. TRAFFIC CALMING MEASURES THAT INCREASE
PEDESTRIAN SAFETY.
[(2)] (4) “Eligible applicant” means:

HOUSE BILL 172
(I) a tax–exempt nonprofit organization;
(II) A GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OF A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION; OR
(III) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN
COLLABORATION WITH A LOCAL NEIGHBORHOOD ASSOCIATION.
[(3) (i) “Facility and community improvement project” means a physical
project or a community service that:
1. makes a facility or a community–managed open space
safer for residents and visitors;
2. encourages the authorized uses of a facility or a
community–managed open space by individuals; or
3. supports community–led efforts to improve the
appearance of a facility or a community–managed open space.
(ii) “Facility and community improvement project” includes:
1. the purchase or installation of:
A. equipment that increases the visibility of vulnerable
spaces, including surveillance tools or adequate lighting for exterior doors, common areas,
or hallways; or
B. landscape architectural design features, including signs,
gardens, paving treatments, plantings, or other upgrades to public spaces;
2. efforts to:
A. improve sight lines within, increase visitation to, or clean
public spaces; or
B. integrate landscape architectural design features into a
facility or a community–managed open space in a manner that connects adjacent
neighborhoods for various users while distancing the users from private areas;
3. timely removal of graffiti and use of graffiti resistance
practices in collaboration with a person who specializes in the area of graffiti removal
services to present a vibrant, maintained space; and
4. contracted land enhancement or groundskeeping services
to maintain or clean open spaces and functional surfaces.]

HOUSE BILL 172 5
(b) An eligible applicant may apply for a grant under the Program for [a facility
and community]:
(1) A COMMUNITY OR BUSINESS DISTRICT improvement project;
(2) A COMMUNITY–CENTERED CRIME AND VIOLENCE INTERVENTION
AND PREVENTION PROJECT; OR
(3) ANY OTHER ELIGIBLE PROJECT.
(c) If an eligible applicant submits an application for a grant under the Program
for a [facility and community improvement] project to purchase or install [a network of
cameras or] license readers, the eligible applicant shall include with the application[:
(1) a monitoring plan;
(2)] evidence of a partnership with law enforcement[, the governmental
unit responsible for traffic enforcement for the political subdivision,] and any other relevant
public agencies[; and
(3) a list of possible locations of cameras and license readers and a plan for
providing notice of locations to property owners].
(d) The Department may award an eligible applicant who submits a complete
application for financial assistance under the Program for [a facility and community
improvement] AN ELIGIBLE project a grant IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT [that:
(1) is at least $25,000; and
(2) does not exceed $50,000].
[6–1305.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Business district and neighborhood security project” means a
comprehensive plan for enhancing the visual perception of safety along commercial
corridors and adjacent areas.
(ii) “Business district and neighborhood security project” includes:
1. the purchase or installation of:

HOUSE BILL 172
A. equipment that increases the visibility of vulnerable
spaces, including surveillance tools, adequate lighting for exterior doors, common areas, or
hallways, or pedestrian–scale street lighting in high–pedestrian–traffic areas;
B. vehicle or pedestrian control devices;
C. equipment to lock or conceal dumpsters from public
access; or
D. signs, gardens, litter removal equipment, plantings, or
other upgrades to public spaces;
2. efforts to:
A. take into account the needs of neighborhoods in the
surrounding area to improve accessibility for all users, in compliance with Americans with
Disabilities Act standards; or
B. increase citizen and merchant stewardship through
organizing, education, and outreach activities that seek to engage residents and other
community stakeholders to actively participate in the upkeep and improvement of
residential areas and public spaces;
3. contracted cleaning or landscaping services to maintain or
clean improved open spaces;
4. contracted local private security services or similar
community–based programs with a specific emphasis on de–escalation and relationship
building; and
5. other efforts consistent with subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph.
(3) “Eligible applicant” means:
(i) a tax–exempt nonprofit organization;
(ii) a governmental unit for a political subdivision; or
(iii) an institution of higher education in collaboration with a local
neighborhood association.
(b) An eligible applicant may apply for a grant under the Program for a business
district and neighborhood security project.

HOUSE BILL 172 7
(c) If an eligible applicant submits an application for a grant under the Program
for a business district and neighborhood security project to purchase or install a network
of cameras or license readers, the eligible applicant shall include with the application:
(1) a monitoring plan; and
(2) evidence of a partnership with law enforcement, the governmental unit
responsible for traffic enforcement for the political subdivision, and any other relevant
public agencies.
(d) The Department may award an eligible applicant who submits a complete
application for financial assistance under the Program for a business district and
neighborhood security project a grant that:
(1) is at least $75,000; and
(2) does not exceed $150,000.]
[6–1306.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Community–centered crime and violence intervention and prevention
project” means a comprehensive strategy that integrates partnerships and coordinated
activities that:
(i) directly engage individuals who are at risk of becoming involved
with or affected by violence and crime using evidence–based interventions; and
(ii) reduce crime and disorder by carefully examining the
characteristics of problems in neighborhoods and applying appropriate problem–solving
remedies.
(3) “Eligible applicant” means a tax–exempt nonprofit organization.
(b) An eligible applicant may apply for a grant under the Program for a
community–centered crime and violence intervention and prevention project.
(c) The Department may award an eligible applicant who submits a complete
application for financial assistance under the Program for a community–centered crime
and violence intervention and prevention project a grant that does not exceed $250,000.]
[6–1307.] 6–1305.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Community Health and Safety Works Grant
Program Fund.

HOUSE BILL 172
(b) There is a Community Health and Safety Works Grant Program Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to provide financial assistance in the form of grants
under the provisions of the Program for eligible projects.
(d) The Department shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) earnings from the investment of money in the Fund;
(3) interest earnings of the Fund; and
(4) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used only [for providing financial assistance in the form of
grants under the Program]:
(1) TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE IN THE FORM OF GRANTS
UNDER THE PROGRAM TO ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS; AND
(2) FOR ADMINISTRATIVE AND OPERATING EXPENSES OF THE
DEPARTMENT IN CARRYING OUT THE PROGRAM.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.